South Dakota, session 2026, SB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-5-8 be AMENDED:
12-5-8. The county auditor shall include on the official ballot for a primary election
the name of each candidate for precinct committeeman or precinct committeewoman, in
the manner prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
Section 2. That § 12-9-12 be AMENDED:
12-9-12. In a primary election at which candidates for judicial office are to be
nominated, the name of each candidate must be placed on the official primary election
ballot, as prescribed by the State Board of Elections, in the order designated by the
secretary of state, without any party designation.
Section 3. That § 12-9-13 be REPEALED.
Section 4. That § 12-13-11 be REPEALED.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in full force
and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.317.20 2 32
An Act to amend and repeal provisions pertaining to the ballot requirements for certain
elections and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 32
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 32 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB32 ENROLLED